Maryland, session 2025, HB0823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0823*

HOUSE BILL 823
(b) (1) “Algorithmic decision system” means a computational process that
facilitates decision making.
(2) “Algorithmic decision system” includes decisions derived from
machines, statistics, facial recognition, and decisions on paper.
(c) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine–based system that:
(1) can, for a given set of human–defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) uses machine and human–based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments and abstracts those perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner; and
(3) uses model inference to formulate options for information or action.
(d) “GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” MEANS ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE THAT CAN GENERATE DERIVED SYNTHETIC CONTENT, SUCH AS TEXT,
IMAGES, VIDEO, AND AUDIO, THAT EMULATES THE STRUCTURE AND
CHARACTERISTICS OF THE DATA USED TO TRAIN THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
(E) (1) “High–risk artificial intelligence” means artificial intelligence that is a
risk to individuals or communities, as defined under regulations adopted by the
Department in consultation with the Governor’s Artificial Intelligence Subcabinet.
(2) “High–risk artificial intelligence” includes rights–impacting artificial
intelligence and safety–impacting artificial intelligence.
[(e)] (F) “Impact assessment” means an assessment of artificial intelligence
systems made under regulations adopted by the Department in consultation with the
Governor’s Artificial Intelligence Subcabinet and required under § 3.5–803 of this subtitle.
[(f)] (G) “Public senior higher education institution” means:
(1) the constituent institutions of the University System of Maryland and
the University of Maryland Center for Environmental Science;
(2) Morgan State University; or
(3) St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
[(g)] (H) “Rights–impacting artificial intelligence” means artificial intelligence
whose output serves as a basis for decision or action that is significantly likely to affect civil
rights, civil liberties, equal opportunities, access to critical resources, or privacy.

HOUSE BILL 823 3
[(h)] (I) “Safety–impacting artificial intelligence” means artificial intelligence
that has the potential to significantly impact the safety of human life, well–being, or critical
infrastructure.
3.5–807.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DEVELOPER” MEANS A PERSON OR A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT THAT DESIGNS, CODES, PRODUCES, OR SUBSTANTIALLY MODIFIES A
GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(3) “SUBSTANTIALLY MODIFIES” MEANS TO RELEASE A NEW VERSION
OF OR UPDATE TO A GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT
MATERIALLY CHANGES THE FUNCTIONALITY, PERFORMANCE, OR TRAINING DATA
OF A GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT WAS RELEASED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2022, FOR
USE BY THE GENERAL PUBLIC IN THE STATE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE TERMS
OF THAT USE REQUIRE COMPENSATION.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT IS EXCLUSIVELY MADE FOR:
(I) USE BY HOSPITAL MEDICAL STAFF;
(II) USE BY AN AFFILIATE OF THE DEVELOPER OF THE
GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(III) ENSURING PHYSICAL SAFETY OF AN INDIVIDUAL;
(IV) PROTECTING CONFIDENTIAL PERSONAL INFORMATION;
(V) DETECTING, RESISTING, OR PROSECUTING MALICIOUS,
DECEPTIVE, FRAUDULENT, OR ILLEGAL ACTIONS;
(VI) THE OPERATION OF AIRCRAFT IN THE NATIONAL AIRSPACE;
OR
(VII) USE BY A FEDERAL ENTITY TO SUPPORT NATIONAL
SECURITY, MILITARY, OR OTHER DEFENSE PURPOSES.

HOUSE BILL 823
(C) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND BEFORE EACH TIME
THEREAFTER A DEVELOPER RELEASES OR SUBSTANTIALLY MODIFIES A
GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, THE DEVELOPER OF THE
GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SHALL POST ON THE WEBSITE OF
THE DEVELOPER DOCUMENTATION DETAILING THE DATA AND DATASETS USED TO
TRAIN THE GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, INCLUDING:
(1) THE SOURCES OR OWNERS OF THE DATA;
(2) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE DATA FURTHERS THE INTENDED
PURPOSE OF THE GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(3) IF A DATASET USED FOR TRAINING IS:
(I) STATIC, THE NUMBER OF DATA POINTS INCLUDED WITHIN
THE DATASET; OR
(II) DYNAMIC, AN ESTIMATE OF THE NUMBER OF DATA POINTS
INCLUDED WITHIN THE DATASET;
(4) IF A DATASET:
(I) INCLUDES LABELS, THE TYPES OF LABELS USED IN THE
DATASET; OR
(II) DOES NOT INCLUDE LABELS, THE GENERAL
CHARACTERISTICS OF THE DATAPOINTS WITHIN THE DATASET;
(5) WHETHER ANY DATA ARE IN THE PUBLIC DOMAIN OR ARE
PROTECTED BY COPYRIGHT, TRADEMARK, OR PATENT;
(6) WHETHER THE DEVELOPER PURCHASED OR LICENSED THE DATA;
(7) WHETHER THE DATA INCLUDE ANY PERSONAL INFORMATION;
(8) WHETHER THE DATA INCLUDE AGGREGATE CONSUMER
INFORMATION;
(9) WHETHER THE DEVELOPER CLEANED, PROCESSED, OR MODIFIED
THAT DATA AND WHY THE DEVELOPER CLEANED, PROCESSED, OR MODIFIED THE
DATA;

HOUSE BILL 823 5
(10) (I) THE TIME PERIOD DURING WHICH THE DATA WERE
COLLECTED; AND
(II) WHETHER THE DATA COLLECTION IS STILL ONGOING;
(11) WHEN THE DATA WERE FIRST USED DURING THE DEVELOPMENT
OF THE GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(12) WHETHER THE GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM
USED OR USES SYNTHETIC DATA GENERATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.